Hawaii statutes.
[§432D-20] Filings and reports as public
documents. Notwithstanding chapter 92F and any other laws to the contrary,
all applications and filings required under this chapter shall be treated as
public, except for trade secrets or privileged or confidential quality
assurance, commercial, or financial information; provided that any annual
financial statement that may be required under section 432D-5 shall be public.
[L 1995, c 179, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next